Nebraska, session 109, LB312.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 71-5662, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-5662 (1) To be eligible for a student loan under the Rural Health
Systems and Professional Incentive Act, an applicant or a recipient shall be
enrolled or accepted for enrollment in any of the following an accredited
programs in Nebraska:
(a) Medical medical or dental education program;
(b) Physician or physician assistant education program;
(c) Nurse anesthesia practice program; or
(d) Dietitian nutritionist program; or
(e) Approved an approved mental health practice program in Nebraska.
(2) To be eligible for the medical resident incentive under the act, an
applicant or a recipient shall be enrolled or accepted for enrollment in an
approved medical specialty residency program in Nebraska.
(3) To be eligible for loan repayment under the act, an applicant or a
recipient shall:
(a) Be one of the following: be
(i) A a pharmacist; ,
(ii) A a dentist; ,
(iii) A a physical therapist; ,
(iv) An an occupational therapist; ,
(v) A a mental health practitioner; ,
(vi) A a psychologist licensed under the requirements of section 38-3114
or the equivalent thereof; ,
(vii) A a nurse practitioner; ,
(viii) A nurse anesthetist;
(ix) A a physician assistant; ,
(x) A dietitian nutritionist licensed under section 38-1813;
(xi) A a psychiatrist; , or
(xii) A a physician in an approved specialty; and
(b) Be shall be licensed to practice in Nebraska; ,
(c) Not not be enrolled in a residency program; ,
(d) Not not be practicing under a provisional or temporary license; , and
(e) Enter enter practice in a designated health profession shortage area
in Nebraska.
Sec. 2. Section 71-5663, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-5663 (1) The amount of financial assistance provided through student
loans pursuant to the Rural Health Systems and Professional Incentive Act shall
be limited to thirty thousand dollars for each recipient for each academic year
and, except as provided in subdivision (4)(a) of this section, shall not exceed
one hundred twenty thousand dollars per medical, dental, or doctorate-level
mental health student or thirty thousand dollars per master's level mental
health or physician assistant student.
(2) The amount of financial assistance provided through the medical
resident incentive program pursuant to the act shall be limited to forty
thousand dollars for each recipient for each year of residency and, except as
provided in subdivision (4)(b) of this section, shall not exceed one hundred
twenty thousand dollars.
(3) The amount of financial assistance provided by the state through loan
repayments pursuant to the act (a) for physicians, psychiatrists, dentists, and
psychologists shall be limited to thirty thousand dollars per recipient per
year of full-time practice in a designated health profession shortage area and,
except as provided in subdivision (4)(c) of this section, shall not exceed
ninety thousand dollars per recipient and (b) for physician assistants, nurse
practitioners, nurse anesthetists, pharmacists, physical therapists,
occupational therapists, dietitian nutritionists, and mental health
practitioners shall be limited to fifteen thousand dollars per recipient per
year of full-time practice in a designated health profession shortage area and,
except as provided in subdivision (4)(c) of this section, shall not exceed
forty-five thousand dollars per recipient.
-1-

LB312 LB312
2025 2025
(4)(a) The total amount of financial assistance provided through student
loans for a doctorate-level mental health student or master's level mental
health student shall be the full amount of such loans for a person who
practices psychiatry, psychology, or mental health practice:
(i) For at least five years in a designated health profession shortage
area; and
(ii) If all or a majority of such practice consists of the treatment of
members of the community supervision population.
(b) The total amount of financial assistance provided through the medical
resident incentive program for a psychiatrist shall be the full amount of such
psychiatrist's qualified educational debts if such person practices psychiatry:
(i) For at least five years in a designated health profession shortage
area; and
(ii) If all or a majority of such practice consists of the treatment of
members of the community supervision population.
(c) The total amount of financial assistance provided through loan
repayments pursuant to the act for psychiatrists, psychologists, and mental
health practitioners shall be the full amount of such person's qualified
educational debts if such person practices psychiatry, psychology, or mental
health practice:
(i) For at least five years in a designated health profession shortage
area; and
(ii) If all or a majority of such practice consists of the treatment of
members of the community supervision population.
(5) For purposes of this section, community supervision population means
persons on probation, post-release supervision, and pretrial release.
Sec. 3. Section 71-5665, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-5665 The commission shall periodically designate health profession
shortage areas within the state for the following professions: Medicine and
surgery, psychiatry, physician assistants' practice, nurse practitioners'
practice, nurse anesthesia practice, dietitian nutritionist practice,
psychology, and mental health practitioners' practice. The commission shall
also periodically designate separate health profession shortage areas for each
of the following professions: Pharmacy, dentistry, physical therapy, and
occupational therapy. In making such designations the commission shall
consider, after consultation with other appropriate agencies concerned with
health services and with appropriate professional organizations, among other
factors:
(1) The latest reliable statistical data available regarding the number of
health professionals practicing in an area and the population to be served by
such practitioners;
(2) Inaccessibility of health care services to residents of an area;
(3) Particular local health problems;
(4) Age or incapacity of local practitioners rendering services; and
(5) Demographic trends in an area both past and future.
Sec. 4. Section 71-5668, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-5668 Each loan repayment recipient shall execute an agreement with the
department and a local entity. Such agreement shall be exempt from the
requirements of the State Procurement Act and shall include, at a minimum, the
following terms:
(1) The loan repayment recipient agrees to practice his or her profession,
and a physician, psychiatrist, dentist, nurse practitioner, nurse anesthetist,
dietitian nutritionist, or physician assistant also agrees to practice an
approved specialty, in a designated health profession shortage area for at
least three years, or the period required by subdivision (4)(c) of section
71-5663, and to accept medicaid patients in his or her practice;
(2) In consideration of the agreement by the recipient, the State of
Nebraska and a local entity within the designated health profession shortage
area will provide equal funding for the repayment of the recipient's qualified
educational debts except as provided in subdivision (5) of this section, in
amounts up to thirty thousand dollars per year per recipient for physicians,
psychiatrists, dentists, and psychologists and up to fifteen thousand dollars
per year per recipient for physician assistants, nurse practitioners, nurse
anesthetists, pharmacists, physical therapists, occupational therapists,
dietitian nutritionists, and mental health practitioners toward qualified
educational debts for up to three years or a longer period as required by
subdivision (4)(c) of section 71-5663. The department shall make payments
directly to the recipient;
(3) If the loan repayment recipient discontinues practice in the shortage
area prior to completion of the three-year requirement or the period required
by subdivision (4)(c) of section 71-5663, as applicable, the recipient shall
repay to the state one hundred fifty percent of the total amount of funds
provided to the recipient for loan repayment with interest at a rate of eight
percent simple interest per year from the date of default. Upon repayment by
the recipient to the department, the department shall reimburse the local
entity its share of the funds which shall not be more than the local entity's
share paid to the loan repayment recipient;
(4) Any practice or payment obligation incurred by the loan repayment
recipient under the loan repayment program is canceled in the event of the loan
repayment recipient's total and permanent disability or death;
(5) For a loan repayment recipient seeking benefits under subdivision (4)
-2-

LB312 LB312
2025 2025
(c) of section 71-5663, the recipient agrees to such other terms as the
department deems appropriate; and
(6) Beginning on July 1, 2022, any agreements entered into by December 31,
2024, shall first use federal funds from the federal American Rescue Plan Act
of 2021 for the purposes of repaying qualified educational debts prior to using
any state or local funds. Agreements using federal funds from the federal
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 shall not require equal funding from a local
entity. Any federal funds from the act committed to agreements during this time
period shall be used by December 31, 2026.
Sec. 5. Original sections 71-5662, 71-5663, 71-5665, and 71-5668, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-3-